Illinois, session 104th, SB533.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Private Activity Bond Approval Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 346/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Private Activity Bond Approval Act.9(Source: P.A. 96-1493, eff. 1-1-11.)